Kentucky statutes. TITLE XLI Laws
CHAPTER 446 Construction of Statutes
446.130.
Kentucky
Revised Statutes speak for themselves — Conflicts — Ambiguities.

The Kentucky Revised Statutes
of 1942 are intended to speak for themselves, and all sections of the Kentucky
Revised Statutes of 1942 shall be considered to speak as of the same date,
except that in cases of conflict between two (2) or more sections or of a
latent or patent ambiguity in a section, reference may be had to the Acts
of the General Assembly from which the sections are indicated to have been
derived, for the purpose of applying the rules of construction relating to
repeal by implication or for the purpose of resolving the ambiguity. Like
reference may be had to any special acts or charters granted by the General
Assembly prior to the adoption of the present Constitution, for the like purpose.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 208, § 1, effective October 1, 1942.

446.140.
Titles, headings, and notes.

Title heads, chapter heads, section and subsection heads or titles, and explanatory notes and cross references, in the Kentucky Revised Statutes, do not constitute any part of the law, except as provided in KRS

355.1-107

.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 208, § 1, effective October 1, 1942; 1958, ch. 77, § 10-108; 2014, ch. 71, § 12, effective July 15, 2014.

446.145.
Manner
of indicating amended, created, repealed, and repealed and reenacted sections
and sections not intended to be codified.

Bills amending an existing section of the statutes shall indicate the material proposed to be deleted by brackets and by striking through the material.

Bills amending an existing section of the statutes shall indicate new material by underlining.

Bills creating a new section of the statutes shall begin with the phrase “A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER —— IS CREATED TO READ AS FOLLOWS:” and shall contain underlining of all material in the section.

Bills repealing a section of the statutes shall list the statute number and headnote.

Bills repealing and reenacting a section of the statutes without change from the text of that statute as it read at the time of its repeal shall begin with the phrase “KRS —— is repealed and reenacted (or ‘reenacted as a new section of KRS Chapter ——’, if appropriate) to read as follows:” and shall not contain underlining of the reenacted text.

Bills repealing and reenacting a section of the statutes with changes from the text of that statute as it read at the time of its repeal shall begin with the phrase “KRS —— is repealed, reenacted (or ‘reenacted as a new section of KRS Chapter ——’, if appropriate), and amended to read as follows:”, shall indicate the material proposed to be deleted by brackets and by striking through the material, and shall indicate new material by underlining.

Bills repealing and reenacting a section of the statutes with text totally different from the text of that statute as it read at the time of its repeal or so substantially different that using the procedure set out in paragraph (b) of this subsection is impracticable shall begin with the phrase “KRS —— IS REPEALED AND REENACTED (or ‘REENACTED AS A NEW SECTION OF KRS CHAPTER ——’, if appropriate) TO READ AS FOLLOWS:” and shall indicate the reenacted text of the statute by underlining.

Sections of a bill not intended to be codified shall begin simply with the section number within the bill without any further introductory phrase, and the text of those sections shall be in normal type and not in all capitals or with underlining. These not-to-be-codified sections shall ordinarily be placed at the end of the bill or, in a bill having multiple parts, at the end of a particular part of that bill. Unless expressly drafted in a manner indicating codification is intended or unless determined by the reviser of statutes that codification is appropriate and necessary, the following material shall not be codified, in conformity with KRS 7.131(3):

Repealers and repeals of repealers;

Appropriation provisions;

Temporary provisions;

Construction clauses, including severability clauses;

A short title, if necessary, for an act that is not a distinct codifiable unit; and

Effective date provisions.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 43, § 1; 1992, ch. 431, § 5, effective July 14, 1992; 1996, ch. 46, § 10, effective July 1, 1997.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Amended sections to be published at length,
Const., § 51.

446.150.
Kentucky
Revised Statutes substituted for former laws.

The provisions of the Kentucky
Revised Statutes of 1942 shall be considered as substituted in a continuing
way for the provisions of the prior statute laws repealed by the act enacting
the Kentucky Revised Statutes.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 208, § 1, effective October 1, 1942.

446.160.
Unconstitutionality
of part of Kentucky Revised Statutes, effect.

If any provision of the Kentucky
Revised Statutes, derived from an act that amended or repealed a pre-existing
statute, is held unconstitutional, the general repeal of all former statutes
by the act enacting the Kentucky Revised Statutes shall not prevent the pre-existing
statute from being law if that appears to have been the intent of the General
Assembly.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 208, § 1, effective October 1, 1942,.

446.170.
Effect
of 1942 act amending or repealing section of Carroll’s Statutes or of former
legislative act.

Any act passed at the 1942 Regular
Session of the General Assembly amending or repealing any provision of the
statute laws by reference to a section number of the Session Acts or of Carroll’s
Statutes shall be considered as amending or repealing, as the case may be,
so much of the Kentucky Revised Statutes as is indicated in the Kentucky Revised
Statutes as having been derived from the section of the Session Acts or of
Carroll’s Statutes so amended or repealed, and shall not be considered as
reviving any part of Carroll’s Statutes or of any Session Acts so amended
other than the part set forth at length in the amending act.

History.

Enact. Acts 1942, ch. 208, § 3.

446.180.
Rules
of construction applicable to Kentucky Revised Statutes and Criminal Code
concerning Rules of Civil Procedure. [Repealed.]

446.190.
Rules
of Civil Procedure to govern taking of appeals — Statutes govern time
of taking certain appeals.

Where a statute grants a right
of appeal to the Court of Appeals in special civil cases, the Rules of Civil
Procedure shall govern the taking of the appeal, unless in conflict with a
specific provision of the statute, except that any notice of appeal required
by the Rules shall be given within the time specified in the Rules. In all
cases where the statute limits the taking of the appeal to a specific time
the appeal shall be docketed in the Court of Appeals within the time so specified.

History.

Enact. Acts 1952, ch. 84, § 3.

446.200.
Demurrer,
motion to quash, construction.

As used in any statute that
relates to criminal procedure, the terms “demurrer,” “motion
to quash” or similar terms shall be construed to mean the motion raising
a defense or objection as provided in the Rules of Criminal Procedure.

History.

Enact. Acts 1962, ch. 234, § 58.

Research References and Practice Aids

Cross-References.

Defenses, motion for, RCr 8.16 to 8.24.

446.210.
References
to Criminal Code. [Repealed.]